trunk/morphology/normalizer/normalizer.xfst
       #--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       # -yku becomes -yka before -mu, -pu, -ysi, -chi, -ri, -cha                             #
       # and -na. Seems not always to be the case, therefore, this rule is optional (->)      #
       #--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       define ykuyka1 [ {yku}"@YKU" (->) {yka}"@YKU" || _   ?* ["@MU"|"@PU"|"@YSI"|"@CHI"|"@RI"|"+Rzpr"]];
       define ykuyka2 [ {yu}"@YKU" (->) {ya}"@YKU" || _ ?* ["@MU"|"@PU"|"@YSI"|"@CHI"|"@RI"|"+Rzpr"]];
       
       #--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       # -mu translocative --> as -m only before pu (might otherwise be confused wth -mpa, positional, -mpu can be written as npu #
       #--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       define mpuDIR [ {mu}"@MU" -> [n|m]"@MU"  ||  _ ?* "@PU" ];

       #----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       # pu regressive --> pa only before ku and mu                                                   #
       # with -ku: if -na in between pu->pa seems to be optional (?), TODO: check!                    #
       #----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       define pupamu [ {pu}"@PU" -> {pa}"@PU" ||  _  ?* "@MU" ];
       define pupaku [ {pu}"@PU" -> {pa}"@PU" ||  _  [{ku}|{ka}]"@KU"];
       define pupanaku [ {pu}"@PU" (->) {pa}"@PU" ||  _  [{naku}|{naka}]"@KU"];
       define pupa pupamu .o. pupaku .o. pupanaku;

       #-----------------------------------------------------------------------#
       # ku reflexive --> ka before chi and mu and pu (possibley before na (?) #
       #-----------------------------------------------------------------------#
       define kuka [ {ku}"@KU" -> {ka}"@KU" ||  _  ?* ["@MU"|"@CHI"|"@PU"|"+Rzpr"] ];
       
   define VerbRulesLower rqurqa1 .o. rqurqa2  .o. rqurqa3 .o. rqurqa4 .o. ykuyka1 .o. ykuyka2  .o. mpuDIR .o. pupa .o. kuka ;


       ##############
       # AMBIVALENT #
       ##############

       #--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       # evidential suffixes mi,si,cha as -m,-s,-ch only after vowel. Apply rule to complete word form, after cleanup #
       # of flags, otherwise the context might not be right                                                           #
       #--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#


	define SI1 [  {s}"@SI"  => Vowel _  ];
	define SI2 [  [{si}"@SI"|{sis}"@SIS"] => Cons _  ];

	define MI1 [  {m}"@MI"  => Vowel _  ];
	define MI2 [  {n}"@MI"  => Vowel _  ];
	define MI3 [  [{mi}|{min}]"@MI" => Cons _  ];

	define CHA1 [  {ch}"@CHA"  => Vowel _  ];
	define CHA2 [  {chi}"@CHA"  => Cons _  ];
	define CHA3 [  {cha}"@CHA" => Cons _  ];

	define AmbiRules SI1 .o. SI2 .o. MI1 .o. MI2 .o. MI3 .o. CHA1 .o. CHA2 .o. CHA3;

########################################################################
########################################################################
##                                                                    ##
##               DERIVATION BOUNDARIES                                ##
##                                                                    ##
########################################################################
########################################################################


      #--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
      # 1. special case: last verbal IG: DB before aspect, tense, if present, else before person suffix  #
      # 2. special case: last IG as-suffixes, DB before slot 6 if present, else slot 7                   #
      #--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#

      define IGverb1  [ "" <-  %["^DB"%] || "+Prog"%] _  ?* [%["Tns"%]|%["VPers"%]] ];
      define IGverb2  [ "" <-  %["^DB"%] || ["+NPst"|"+IPst"|"+Prog"]%] _  ?* %["VPers" ];
      define IGas1     [ "" <-  %["^DB"%] || ["+Top"|"+QTop"|"+Dub"]%] _  ];
      define IGas2     [ "" <-  %["^DB"%] || ["@MI"|"@SI"|"@CHA"] _  ];
define IGRules IGverb1 .o. IGverb2 .o. IGas1 .o. IGas2;


#################################################################################

      #######################
      #                     #
      # AMBIVALENT SUFFIXES #
      #                     #
      #######################

      define AS=1 DB @re"as-1.regex" ;
      define AS=2 DB @re"as-2.regex" ;
      define AS=3 DB @re"as-3.regex" ;
      define AS=4 DB @re"as-4.regex" ;
      define AS=5 DB @re"as-5.regex" ;
      define AS=6 DB @re"as-6.regex" ;
      define AS=7 DB @re"as-7.regex" ;
      define HonAff DB @re"hon_aff.regex";

      define AS [(HonAff) (AS=1) (HonAff) (AS=2) (AS=3)^{0,2} (HonAff) (AS=4) (HonAff) (AS=5) (AS=6) (AS=7)] ;


####################################################################################

       ##########
       #        #
       # VERBS  #
       #        #
       ##########

       define VRootQ @re"vroot-with-translations.regex" .o. QuechuaOrtho;
       define VRootES @re"vroot-es.regex" .o. SpanOrtho;
       define VRootTrans @re"vroot-trans-with-translations.regex" .o. QuechuaOrtho;  

       define VROOT [VRootQ|VRootES];

       define V=V=1 @re"v-v-1.regex" ;
       define V=V=2 @re"v-v-2.regex" ;
       define V=V=3 DB @re"v-v-3.regex" ;
       define V=V=4 DB @re"v-v-4.regex" ;
       define V=V=5 DB @re"v-v-5.regex" ;
       define V=V=6 DB @re"v-v-6-norm.regex" ;
       define V=V=7 @re"v-v-7.regex" ;
       # needed for sequence -nayuku-
       define reflexive [ "[" "^DB" "]" "[" "--" "]" {ku}"+ku+" "[" "VDeriv" "]" "[" "+Rflx_Int" "]" ] : {ku}"@KU";

    define VerbSuffixes  VerbRulesUpper  .o. [(HonAff) V=V=1^{0,4} (HonAff) V=V=2^{0,5} (HonAff)  (V=V=1) (reflexive) (HonAff) (V=V=3) (HonAff) (V=V=4)(HonAff) (V=V=5) (HonAff) V=V=6 (V=V=7)]  .o. VerbRulesLower .o. QuechuaOrtho;


#####################################################################################

       #########
       #       #
       # NOUNS #
       #       #
       #########

       define NRootQ @re"nroot-with-translations.regex"  .o. QuechuaOrtho;
       define NRootES @re"nroot-es.regex" .o. SpanOrtho ;
       define NRootNUM  @re"nroot-num.regex"   .o. QuechuaOrtho;
       define NRootINDEF @re"nroot-indef-with-translations.regex" .o. QuechuaOrtho;
       define NRootCMP @re"nroot-cmp-with-translations.regex" .o. QuechuaOrtho;

       define NROOT [NRootQ|NRootES|NRootNUM|NRootINDEF];

       define N=N=1 @re"n-n-1.regex" ;
       define N=N=2 DB @re"n-n-2.regex" ;
       define N=N=3 DB @re"n-n-3.regex" ;
       define npers DB @re"npers.regex" ; #nominal transitive forms
       define N=N=4 @re"n-n-4.regex" ;
       define N=N=5 DB @re"n-n-5.regex" ;
       define N=N=6 DB @re"n-n-6.regex" ;
       define N=N=7 DB @re"n-n-7.regex" ;

      define NounSuffixes PossessivPlural .o. [(N=N=1) (HonAff)  N=N=2^{0,2} (HonAff) (N=N=5) (HonAff) (N=N=3) (HonAff) (N=N=4) (HonAff) (N=N=5)^{0,3} (HonAff) N=N=6^{0,3} N=N=7^{0,2} (HonAff)]  .o. QuechuaOrtho ;
     
######################################################################################

      ######################
      #                    #
      # DERIVED ROOTS      #
      #                    #
      ######################


       define NtoV @re"n-v.regex" ;
       define VtoN DB @re"v-n.regex" ; #mit diesen Suffixen nominalisierte Verben können nicht wieder verbalisiert werden
       define VtoNfinal DB @re"v-n-final.regex" ;
       define VtoNfinalTrans DB @re"v-n-transitive.regex" ;
       define Relational [ "[""--""]" {n} "[" "NDeriv" "]""[" "+Rel" "]" ] : {n};
       define VerbalSuffixesBeforeNS  VerbRulesUpper .o. [(HonAff) V=V=1^{0,3} (HonAff) V=V=2^{0,5} (HonAff) (V=V=1) (reflexive) (HonAff) (V=V=3) (HonAff) (V=V=4) (HonAff)] .o. VerbRulesLower;
       
       #------------------------#
       # nominalized verbs:     #
       # VRoot + VtoN = NDeriv1 #
       # "taki-qti", "taki-y"   #
       #------------------------#
       define NDeriv1 [VROOT  VerbalSuffixesBeforeNS VtoN];
       define NDeriv1final [VROOT  VerbalSuffixesBeforeNS VtoNfinal];

       #----------------------------#
       # verbalized nouns:          #
       # NRoot + NtoV = VDeriv1     #
       # "wasi-n-cha-", "hatun-ya-" #
       # NtoV: -ykacha/kacha as     #
       # verbalizing suffix         #
       #----------------------------#
       define VDeriv1 [NROOT (Relational) (HonAff) NtoV];

       #--------------------------------#
       # nominalized verb Nr.2:         #
       # NRoot + NtoV + VtoN = NDeriv2  #
       # "wasi-n-cha-y", "hatun-ya-sqa" #
       #--------------------------------#
       define NDeriv2 [VDeriv1  VerbalSuffixesBeforeNS VtoN];
       define NDeriv2final [VDeriv1  VerbalSuffixesBeforeNS VtoNfinal];

       #--------------------------------#
       # verbalized noun Nr.2:          #
       # VRoot + VtoN + NtoV = VDeriv1  #
       # "yaku-naya-q"                  #
       #--------------------------------#
       define VDeriv2 [NDeriv1 NtoV];

       #-------------------------------------#
       # nominalized verbs Nr.3:             #
       # VRoot + VtoN + NtoV +VtoN = NDeriv3 #
       # "yuya-y-cha-ku-y"                   #
       #-------------------------------------#
       define NDeriv3 [VDeriv2  VerbalSuffixesBeforeNS VtoN];
       define NDeriv3final [VDeriv2  VerbalSuffixesBeforeNS VtoNfinal];
       
       #-------------------------------------#
       # nominalized verbs with transitiv    #
       # person markins (in npers.regex)     #
       # "apamuwanaykichik",                 #
       # "yupaychasunaykichik"               #
       #-------------------------------------#   
       define NDeriv1finalTrans [VROOT  VerbalSuffixesBeforeNS VtoNfinalTrans];
       define NDeriv1finalTrans2 [[VDeriv2|VDeriv1]  VerbalSuffixesBeforeNS VtoNfinalTrans];

define NDERIV [NDeriv1|NDeriv2|NDeriv3];
define NDERIVFINAL [NDeriv1final|NDeriv2final|NDeriv3final];
define VDERIV [VDeriv1|VDeriv2];

       ###########################################
       #                                         #
       # verbs with incorporated nominal root    #
       #                                         #
       ###########################################
       define VRootInc [NRootQ VRootTrans];
       
       #--------------------------------------------------------#
       # nominalized verb with incorporated nominal root:       #
       # "uywamichiy"                                           #
       #--------------------------------------------------------#
       define NRootInc [VRootInc  VerbalSuffixesBeforeNS [VtoN|VtoNfinal]];

       #--------------------#
       # nominal compounds  #
       #--------------------#
       
       define Compounds [[NRootQ|NDeriv1] DB MB NRootCMP];


define NounConverb  [[NDERIVFINAL] (HonAff) (N=N=3) (N=N=5) (N=N=6) (N=N=7)] ;
define NounConverbTrans watrans .o. sutrans .o. [[NDeriv1finalTrans|NDeriv1finalTrans2] (HonAff) npers (N=N=5) (N=N=6) (N=N=7)] ;
define NounNormal PossessivPlural .o. [[NROOT|NDERIV|NRootInc|Compounds] NounSuffixes] ;
define Noun [NounConverb|NounNormal|NounConverbTrans];
define Verb  [[VROOT|VDERIV|VRootInc] VerbSuffixes];


#########################################################################
#########################################################################

       ############
       #          #
       # PRONOUNS #
       #          #
       ############
